Massachusetts, session 194th, H4278.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 13 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section
26 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 26. (a) There shall be a board of registration in veterinary medicine, in sections
27 and 28 called the board, consisting of 4 veterinarians, 3 licensed veterinary technicians, as
defined in section 54A of chapter 112, selected from a list of nominees provided by the
Massachusetts Veterinary Technician Association, and 2 representatives of the public, subject to
section 9B. Each member shall be appointed by the governor. Each member of the board shall be
a legal resident of the commonwealth. Each veterinarian member of the board shall be licensed
to practice veterinary medicine in the commonwealth, a graduate of a school or college teaching
veterinary medicine and approved by the approving authority and shall have had at least 5 years’
experience in the active practice of veterinary medicine, surgery and dentistry prior to their
of 5

appointment. Each licensed veterinary technician member shall be licensed in accordance with
section 56F of chapter 112. No member shall be a member of any faculty in any institution
having the power to confer degrees in veterinary medicine. One member thereof shall annually
before December first be appointed by the governor, for 5 years from January first following. No
member appointed to a full 5-year term shall be reappointed to succeed themself.
SECTION 2. Section 54A of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after the definition of “Board”, the following
definition:-
“Licensed veterinary technician”, a graduate of an American Veterinary Medical
Association accredited program in veterinary technology or veterinary nursing who has achieved
a passing score on an approved licensing exam as determined by the board and is licensed in the
commonwealth.
SECTION 3. Said section 54A of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting, after the definition of “Veterinarian”, the following definition:-
“Veterinary assistant”, an individual working as part of a veterinary healthcare team who
is not a licensed veterinary technician.
SECTION 4. Said section 54A of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following definition:-
“Veterinary technology”, the performance of services within the field of veterinary
medicine by a licensed veterinary technician who is employed by or under the supervision of a
of 5

licensed veterinarian to perform such duties as are required in carrying out medical orders as
prescribed by a licensed veterinarian.
SECTION 5. Said chapter 112 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 56E
the following section:-
Section 56F. (a)(1) An individual shall be licensed as a veterinary technician, by the
board, to practice veterinary technology. Only those individuals who are licensed shall utilize the
title of veterinary technician. No person shall hold themself out as a licensed veterinary
technician or as being able to practice veterinary technology in the commonwealth unless
licensed in accordance with this section; provided, that any individual or veterinary practice in
violation of this subsection may be subject to fines as established by the board.
(2) Veterinary technician students, or other individuals deemed appropriate by the board,
working under the supervision of a licensed veterinarian or a licensed veterinary technician may
engage in activities necessary to learn and practice supervised techniques on patients.
(b)(1) The board shall promulgate rules and regulations by which veterinary technicians
shall be licensed and registered in the commonwealth. The board may recommend the
suspension or revocation of a veterinary technician’s license for failure to abide by the laws of
the commonwealth or regulations promulgated by the board.
(2) The regulations shall: (i) delineate the duties which supervising, licensed veterinarians
may assign to licensed veterinary technicians and to non-licensed veterinary assistants; (ii)
address the maintenance, suspension and revocation of licenses; (iii) provide for continuing
education requirements for licensed veterinary technicians; (iv) determine the criteria by which
an individual shall be deemed a licensed veterinary technician or a veterinary assistant; and (v)
of 5

establish guidance for students working under the supervision of a licensed veterinarian or
licensed veterinarian technician pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (a).
(c) This section shall not apply to: (i) a research institution as defined in section 136A of
chapter 140; or (ii) special cases, including zoos and aquaria, diagnostic facilities, licensed
wildlife rehabilitation facilities and any other such special cases as the subsidiary board shall
identify.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding section 26 of chapter 13 of the General Laws, or any other
general or special law to the contrary, the initial appointments of veterinary technicians to the
board of registration in veterinary medicine shall be Massachusetts Veterinary Technician
Association certified veterinary technicians and said initial veterinary technician appointees shall
be appointed for 3-year terms.
SECTION 7. The board of registration in veterinary medicine shall promulgate
regulations pursuant to section 56F of chapter 112 of the General Laws, inserted by section 5, not
later than 180 days after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 8. Not later than 180 days after the effective date of this act, the board of
registration in veterinary medicine shall provide information to veterinarians, veterinary
practices and animal hospitals regarding the differences in the duties and actions allowed for by
licensed veterinary technicians and veterinary assistants as promulgated under regulations
pursuant to section 56F of chapter 112 of the General Laws, inserted by section 5.
SECTION 9. The board of registration in veterinary medicine shall issue temporary
licenses for individuals practicing veterinary technology and shall promulgate regulations for the
of 5

temporary licensure of individuals practicing veterinary technology within 180 days of the
effective date of this act.
SECTION 10. All individuals practicing veterinary medicine technology required to be
licensed pursuant to section 56F of chapter 112 of the General Laws, inserted by section 5, shall
be licensed not later than July 1, 2030.
of 5